test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vagaar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vagāŗ: # Noun 232 'eng /est kubjas/fin' - full paradigm
     vagāŗ+N+Sg+Nom: vagāŗ
     vagāŗ+N+Sg+Gen: vagār
     vagāŗ+N+Sg+Par: vagārt
     vagāŗ+N+Sg+Dat: vagārõn
     vagāŗ+N+Sg+Ins: vagārõks
     vagāŗ+N+Sg+Ill: vagārõ
     vagāŗ+N+Sg+Ela: vagārõst
     vagāŗ+N+Pl+Nom: vagārd
     vagāŗ+N+Pl+Gen: vagārd
     vagāŗ+N+Pl+Par: vagāŗi
     vagāŗ+N+Pl+Dat: vagārdõn
     vagāŗ+N+Pl+Ins: vagārdõks
     vagāŗ+N+Pl+Ill: vagāŗiž
     vagāŗ+N+Pl+Ela: vagāŗist
